Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-1511
Petition; personal service; contents.

(1) A petition to contest the election or challenge the qualifications of a person elected as a member of the Legislature shall be filed with the Clerk of the Legislature within forty calendar days after the general election at which the respondent member was elected, and a copy of the petition shall be personally served on the respondent member. The petition shall be verified by affidavit swearing to the truth of the allegations or based on information and belief. The petitioner shall include with the petition filed with the Clerk of the Legislature proof of personal service upon the respondent member.

(2)(a) A petition to contest the election shall contain the names of the voters whose votes are contested, the grounds upon which such votes are illegal, a full statement of any other grounds upon which the election is contested, and the standing of the petitioner to contest the election.

(b) A petition to challenge qualifications shall contain the constitutional grounds on which the respondent member is alleged to be unqualified and the standing of the petitioner to challenge the respondent member’s qualifications.

Laws 2018, LB744, § 18.